Hawaii statutes.
[§394-8] New industry training program.
(a) There is hereby established the new industry training program, which shall
be administered by the department of labor and industrial relations. Program
moneys may be used to tailor training or retraining programs to meet the needs
of qualifying businesses, to reimburse instructors for valid and approved
expenditures in delivering instruction under the program, to rent appropriate
training facilities and equipment, when necessary, to purchase or develop materials
required to deliver the instruction, and for any other training-related
expenses.

(b) The department shall utilize the resources
of the University of Hawaii, including the community college system, the high
technology development corporation, and other educational and training
resources in the public and private sectors throughout the State as may be
appropriate to be used to provide preemployment or employment training or
on-the-job training for local residents hired by businesses relocating to Hawaii
or expanding their local operations. The department may contract for these
training needs from public agencies including the various University of Hawaii
campuses, private educational institutions, nonprofit corporations, or private
entities in order to provide the required training. [L 1987, c 241, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next